Oklahoma, session 2026, SB364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 13-116, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 13-116. A. School district personnel shall be
prohibited from using corporal punishment on students any student
identified with the most significant cognitive disabilities
according to criteria established by the State Department of
Education unless addressed in an annual individualized education
program (IEP) developed a disability in accordance with the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA).
B. A waiver to the provisions of subsection A of this section
shall be granted if the parent or legal guardian of a student
provides written consent.

C. As used in this section, “corporal punishment” means the
deliberate infliction of physical pain by hitting, paddling,
spanking, slapping, or any other physical force used as a means of
discipline.
ENR. S. B. NO. 364 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 25th day of February, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 364 Page 3